bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abanar/PSVWX
abarracar/PSVWX
abatir/IOQRTVWX
abjurar/HPSVWX
abombar/IPRSTVWX
aboyar/PSVWX
abroncar/PSVWX
abuzar/PRSVWX
acabestrillar/PSVWX
acamar/PRSTVWX
acaparar/IPSTVWX
acatar/ILPSTVWX
acelerar/HINPRSTVWX
acetrinar/PSVWX
achicharronar/LPRSTVWX
acicatear/PSVWX
acobijar/PSTVWX
acolchar/PSVWX
acontecer/IWX
acorrer/QTVWX
acrianzar/PSVWX
acuadrillar/PSVWX
acuitar/PRSTVWX
adaptar/HPRSTUVWX
adestrar/PSTVWX
admirar/HPRSTVWX
adrar/PSTVWX
adulzar/PSTVWX
afeitar/PRSTVWX
afistular/PSVWX
agabachar/PSVWX
agarrotear/PSVWX
agitar/HLPRSTVWX
agravar/HILPRSTVWX
agudizar/HPSVWX
aherrumbrar/PSVWX
ahorcajar/PRSVWX
ajar/IPRSTVWX
ajustar/IPRSTUVWX
alardear/PSVWX
alcahazar/PSVWX
alear/HPSVWX
aleudar/PSVWX
alhajar/APSVWX
aligerar/IPRSTVWX
almacenar/IPRSTUVWX
alojar/IPRSTVWX
altear/PSVWX
alustrar/PSVWX
amainar/PSVWX
amanear/PSVWX
amanzanar/IPSVWX
amasar/IPSVWX
amenizar/PRSTVWX
amillarar/IPSVWX
amontazgar/PSVWX
amortecer/IWX
amuchiguar/PSWX
analizar/PRSTUVWX
andar/ILSWX
animalizar/HPSVWX
antedatar/PSVWX
anudar/IPSVWX
apagar/IPRSTUVWX
aparcar/IPSTVWX
apayasar/PSVWX
apelambrar/PSVWX
aperdigar/PSVWX
apiadar/PRSTVWX
aplaudir/OQRTVWX
apomazar/PSVWX
apostrofar/PSVWX
aprovechar/ILPRSTVWX
apuntillar/PSVWX
arcabucear/PSVWX
ariscar/PRSVWX
arponear/PSTVWX
arranchar/PSVWX
arremangar/PSVWX
arribar/PSVWX
arropar/PRSTVWX
asalmerar/PSVWX
asemejar/PRSTVWX
aseverar/HPSVWX
asoldadar/PSVWX
aster/VWX
atablar/PSVWX
ataquizar/PSVWX
atenazar/PSVWX
atibar/PSVWX
atocinar/PSVWX
atracar/PRSTVWX
atresnalar/PSVWX
atronerar/PSVWX
auditar/PRSTVWX
autografiar/PSWX
avenar/IPSVWX
aviejar/PSVWX
avivar/IPRSTVWX
azofrar/PSVWX
azuzar/PSTVWX
bailar/LPSTVWX
balastar/PSVWX
balotar/PSVWX
baquetear/PSVWX
barbotear/PSVWX
barrear/PRSVWX
basar/PRSTVWX
batanar/PSVWX
bazuquear/PSVWX
bermejear/PSVWX
birlar/PSTVWX
blandear/PSVWX
bobinar/PSVWX
bolsiquear/PSVWX
borbotar/PSVWX
bosquejar/PSVWX
brear/PSVWX
brotar/PSVWX
bufonear/PRSVWX
buzar/IPSVWX
caber/WX
cabriolear/PSVWX
caducar/PSVWX
calar/PRSTVWX
calibrar/HPRSTUVWX
calzar/PRSTVWX
campear/PSVWX
cantar/LPRSTVWX
capitalizar/HPSTVWX
caracterizar/HPRSTVWX
cardar/PSVWX
carpintear/PSVWX
cascar/ILPRSTVWX
catapultar/PSTVWX
cavar/PSVWX
cejar/PSVWX
centrar/PRSTUVWX
cerrajear/PSVWX
chalanear/PSVWX
chapar/PSVWX
chapurrear/PSVWX
chasquear/PSVWX
chingar/PSVWX
chispear/LPSVWX
chorrear/PSVWX
churrascar/PSTVWX
cimbrear/LPSVWX
citar/HPRSTVWX
clarificar/HPSTVWX
cloroformizar/HPSVWX
cobrear/PSTVWX
coexistir/VWX
colar/HPRSTWX
colmar/PRSTVWX
combinar/HPRSTUVWX
compadrar/PSVWX
competir/HVWXY
comprometer/IOQRTVWX
conceptuar/PSTWX
concretizar/PSTVWX
confederar/HPRSTVWX
conflagrar/HPSVWX
conjeturar/PSVWX
conquistar/PSTVWX
consistir/VWX
construir/OQWYZ
contemperar/PSTVWX
contrabalancear/PSVWX
contramallar/PSVWX
contraseñar/PSTVWX
convalecer/LWX
convoyar/PSTVWX
copular/HPSVWX
corporizar/PSTVWX
cortejar/PSVWX
cotar/PSVWX
crear/HPRSTUVWX
crispir/VWX
crucificar/PRSTVWX
cualificar/PSVWX
cucharetear/PSVWX
culturar/PSVWX
curiosear/PSVWX
datar/PSVWX
decapar/PSVWX
decorticar/HPSTVWX
deflagrar/HPSVWX
deificar/HPSVWX
demacrar/HPRSTVWX
denigrar/HLPSVWX
departir/VWX
deprimir/ORVWX
derrotar/PRSTVWX
desabrochar/PRSTVWX
desacostumbrar/NPRSTVWX
desafilar/PSVWX
desaguazar/PSVWX
desalagar/PSVWX
desalinear/HPSVWX
desamoblar/PSVWX
desanublar/PSVWX
desapuntar/PSVWX
desasnar/PSVWX
desaviar/PSWX
desbeber/VWX
descacharrar/LPRSTVWX
descapirotar/PSVWX
descascarar/PSVWX
deschapar/PSTVWX
descompadrar/PSVWX
desconvenir/LWY
descristianar/PSVWX
desdinerar/PSVWX
desembojar/PSVWX
desemparvar/PSVWX
desencaminar/PSVWX
desencordar/PSTWX
desengastar/PSVWX
desenrizar/PSVWX
desentrenar/PRSTVWX
desesterar/PSVWX
desfrutar/PSVWX
desgranzar/PSVWX
desherrar/PSWX
desimaginar/PSVWX
deslaidar/PSVWX
deslomar/PSVWX
desmarcar/PRSVWX
desmonetizar/HPSVWX
desoír/QVWY
desorillar/PSVWX
despancar/PSVWX
despechar/PSVWX
despersonalizar/HPRSTVWX
desplatar/HPSVWX
desproveer/WY
desriscar/PSVWX
desterrar/PRSTWX
destruir/OQWYZ
desvedar/PSVWX
detectar/PRSTUVWX
diagnosticar/PSTVWX
dilacerar/HPSVWX
discretear/PSVWX
disimilar/HPRSTVWX
diversificar/HPRSTVWX
dolar/PSWX
dosificar/HPSTVWX
eclipsar/PSVWX
elegantizar/PSVWX
embalsar/PSVWX
embaular/PSVWX
embojar/PSVWX
embozar/PRSTVWX
embustear/PSVWX
empanar/PSVWX
empatar/PSVWX
empergar/PSVWX
empodrecer/WX
emputecer/WX
enarenar/HPRSTVWX
encajar/PSTVWX
encanalar/PSVWX
encapillar/PSVWX
encarrillar/PSVWX
encelar/IPSVWX
enchispar/PRSTVWX
encofrar/PSVWX
encorralar/PSVWX
encunar/PSVWX
enerizar/PSVWX
enfranquecer/WX
enganchar/IPRSTVWX
engavillar/PSVWX
engreír/OQVWY
engullir/QTVWX
enjergar/PSVWX
enlegamar/PSVWX
enmarar/PRSVWX
enquistar/PRSTVWX
enriquecer/IOQRTWX
ensambenitar/PSVWX
ensobinar/PSVWX
entarascar/PSVWX
entrampar/PRSTVWX
entremesear/PSVWX
entrojar/PSVWX
envacar/PSVWX
envilecer/IOQRTWX
equivaler/WX
escabullar/PSVWX
escamotear/PSTVWX
escardillar/PSVWX
esclavizar/PSTVWX
escozar/PSVWX
escuyer/VWX
españolizar/HPSVWX
especular/HPSTVWX
espitar/PSVWX
esquilar/PRSTUVWX
estantalar/PRSTUVWX
estofar/PRSTUVWX
estropajear/PSVWX
evadir/OQRTUVWX
execrar/HPSTVWX
explotar/HPSTVWX
extravenar/PRSTVWX
fallar/PRSTUVWX
favorecer/LOQRTWX
figurear/PSVWX
flanquear/PSTVWX
formatear/PSTVWX
franjear/PSVWX
frutar/PSVWX
galuchar/PSVWX
garrapiñar/PSTVWX
gimotear/PSVWX
gorronear/PSVWX
gravar/LPSVWX
guiar/PRSTWX
hadar/PSVWX
heñir/WY
hermanar/IPRSTVWX
hiperbolizar/PSVWX
homenajear/PSVWX
hostilizar/PSVWX
iconizar/PSTVWX
impactar/PSTVWX
improperar/PSVWX
incomunicar/HPRSTVWX
indisponer/OQRTWY
infundir/QTVWX
inmutar/HPRSVWX
institucionalizar/HPRSTVWX
interinar/PSTVWX
invadir/QTVWX
izquierdear/PSVWX
jaropear/PSVWX
jornalear/PSVWX
lacear/PSVWX
lampar/LPSVWX
latinar/PSVWX
lenizar/PSVWX
lignificar/HPRSTVWX
llagar/PSVWX
lozanear/PSVWX
macerar/HIPSVWX
majadear/PSVWX
malparir/VWX
mandrilar/PSTVWX
manufacturar/HPSVWX
marginar/HPRSTVWX
mascar/APSVWX
maznar/PSVWX
menar/PSVWX
meritar/PSVWX
milagrear/PSVWX
mistar/PSVWX
mohatrar/PSVWX
monitorizar/HPSTVWX
mortificar/HPRSTVWX
mueblar/PSVWX
murmujear/PSVWX
naufragar/PSVWX
noctambular/PSVWX
objetivar/HPSTVWX
ocurrir/VWX
opalizar/PSTVWX
orinar/PSVWX
pactar/PSTVWX
palmotear/PSVWX
paporrear/PSVWX
parpadear/PSVWX
patalear/PSVWX
pegotear/PSVWX
percutir/VWX
perjurar/PSVWX
perturbar/HPRSTVWX
picardear/PSVWX
pintonear/PSVWX
pitorrear/PRSVWX
plastificar/PSVWX
polarizar/HPSVWX
popar/IPSVWX
postular/HLPSTVWX
predestinar/HPSVWX
preordinar/HPSVWX
prevenir/LOQWY
profetizar/PSVWX
propugnar/HPSVWX
pudrir/HIOQRTVW
purgar/HILPSVWX
quinchar/PSVWX
radiodifundir/QTVWX
rapuzar/PSVWX
rastrar/PSVWX
reagrupar/HIPSTVWX
rebalgar/PSVWX
rebufar/PSVWX
recamar/PSTVWX
rechistar/PSVWX
recolectar/PSVWX
reconvenir/WY
recular/PSVWX
reeditar/PSTVWX
refinar/HIPRSTUVWX
refunfuñar/PSVWX
regrabar/PRSTUVWX
reimprimir/VWX
relatar/PSTVWX
rematar/ILNPRSTVWX
rempujar/PSVWX
repasar/PRSTVWX
replantar/HPSVWX
repuntar/PSVWX
rescindir/VWX
respectar/PSVWX
restribar/PSVWX
retener/INOQRTUWX
retratar/HPRSTUVWX
revalidar/HPRSTVWX
revolar/PSWX
ritmar/PSVWX
roncear/PSVWX
rubricar/LPSVWX
rutilar/PSVWX
sajar/PSVWX
saltear/IPSVWX
satisfacer/LOQRTWY
semejar/LPSVWX
sesear/PSVWX
sincopar/PSVWX
soberanear/PSVWX
sobreentender/WX
sobreseer/IQWY
soguear/PSVWX
sollozar/PSVWX
sonrosear/PSVWX
sospechar/PSTVWX
subsumir/QTVWX
sumir/OQRTVWX
suspirar/PSVWX
tajar/ILPSVWX
tarascar/PSVWX
teñir/OQWY
temperar/HLNPSVWX
terquear/PSVWX
tipificar/HPSTVWX
tonificar/HPSVWX
tozar/PSVWX
trancar/PSVWX
transliterar/HPSTVWX
traquear/PSVWX
traslucir/ILORWX
traspirar/HPRSVWX
trechear/PSVWX
triplicar/HPSVWX
tronchar/PRSTVWX
tunar/LPSVWX
uncir/VWX
usurpar/HPSTVWX
vanear/PSVWX
venerar/HPSVWX
verilear/PSVWX
visear/PSVWX
volatizar/PSVWX
yuxtaponer/OQRTWY
zaparrastrar/PSVWX
zoquetear/PSVWX
